Utah statutes.
17D-3-107.   Annual budget and financial reports requirements.

Upon agreement with the commission, the state auditor may modify:

(1)  for filing a budget, a requirement in Subsection 17B-1-614(2) or 17B-1-629(3)(d); or

(2)  for filing a financial report, a requirement in Section 17B-1-639.



Enacted by Chapter 103, 2012 General Session

